Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2804
County board of corrections; functions, duties, and responsibilities; how performed.

Each county board of corrections shall carry out the functions, duties, and responsibilities as provided in Chapter 47, article 1.

Laws 1974, LB 782, § 4.